Missouri, session 2026, HB3341.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 68, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 68.300 and 68.310, to read as follows:
68.300. 1. The state auditor shall conduct quarterly audits on all port authorities
in the state.
2. In addition to quarterly audits required under subsection 1 of this section, the
auditor shall audit a port authority when requested to do so by a petition submitted by a
person who resides or owns real property within the city or county that formed the port
authority if such petition is submitted in the same manner as required by section 29.230.
68.310. 1. All records produced or held by a port authority shall be public
records under the provisions of chapter 610.
2. All port authorities shall publish, within ten business days of creation, the
following documents:
(1) Development agreements;
(2) Payment in lieu of taxes schedules;
(3) Deed restrictions and covenants;
(4) Notices of intended change of use for projects; and
(5) Any studies or reports related to public interests or economic impacts of the
projects of the port authority.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3341 2
3. Before January 1, 2027, port authorities shall publish all records listed in
subsection 2 of this section and in their possession on August 28, 2026.
✔